District of Columbia statutes.
10-507.01

Control of District of Columbia buildings.

All buildings belonging to the District of Columbia shall be under the jurisdiction and control of the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

History

June 29, 1937, 50 Stat. 377, ch. 403, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 9-129.
1973 Ed., § 9-133.

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 2 of D.C. Law 18-73 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 2. The University of the District of Columbia shall have exclusive use of the Bertie Backus Middle School building and site in Lot 802, Square 3757, located at 5171 South Dakota Avenue, N.E., in Ward 5, to expand upon its collegiate mission.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 18-73 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 1502 of D.C. Law 18-222 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 1502. The University of the District of Columbia shall have exclusive use of the closed Patricia R. Harris Educational Center School building and site located at 4600 Livingston Road, S.E., in Ward 8, to expand upon its collegiate mission and Workforce Development and Lifelong Learning Program by continuing to provide Vocational Education and Community College of the District of Columbia courses.”
Section 2002(b) of D.C. Law 18-222 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 18-283 added sections to read as follows:
“SUBTITLE R. UNIVERSITY OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA EXPANSION.
“Sec. 1171. Short title.
“This subtitle may be cited as the ‘University of the District of Columbia Expansion Act of 2010’.
“Sec. 1172. The University of the District of Columbia shall have exclusive use of the closed Patricia R. Harris Educational Center School building and site located at 4600 Livingston Road, S.E., in Ward 8, to expand upon its collegiate mission and Workforce Development and Lifelong Learning Program by continuing to provide Vocational Education and Community College of the District of Columbia courses.
“SUBTITLE S. DCPL AUTHORITY.
“Sec. 1181. Short title.
“This subtitle may be cited as the ‘African-American Civil War Museum Clarification Act of 2010’.
“Sec. 1182. The District of Columbia Public Library is authorized to issue grants and execute contracts pursuant to its authority granted in the Reserve for African-American Civil War Records Act of 2009, effective March 3, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-111; 57 DCR 181).”
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 18-283 provides that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of University of the District of Columbia Expansion Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-144, July 18, 2009, 56 DCR 5877).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3021 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4091 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3021 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4091 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1502 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-450, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5635).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1502 of Fiscal Year 2010 Balanced Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-531, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8109).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see § 3(b) of Budget Support Act Clarification and Technical Amendment Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-543, October 5, 2010, 57 DCR 9630).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 422 of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).

Short Title

Short title: Section 3020 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle C of title III of the act may be cited as the “FEMS and DOC Headquarters Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 4090 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle J of title IV of the act may be cited as the “University of the District of Columbia Expansion Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 421 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle C of title IV of the act may be cited as “University of the District of Columbia Expansion Act of 2010”.

Editor's Notes

Section 3021 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided:

“Sec. 3021. Relocation of headquarters for Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department and Department of Corrections.

“(a) The headquarters of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department and the headquarters of the Department of Corrections shall not be relocated to or housed in the Patricia R. Harris Education Center and no funds shall be expended for those purposes.

“(b) The Mayor shall develop a plan for the permanent relocation of the headquarters for the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department and the Department of Corrections that shall:

“(1) Be submitted to the Council no later than March 1, 2010;

“(2) Be included in the Mayor’s fiscal year 2011 budget and financial plan submission to the Council;

“(3) Include the proposed location for a headquarters for each agency or the location of a headquarters for both agencies;

“(4) Include the time line for relocating the headquarters;

“(5) Include the total costs for relocating the headquarters; and

“(6) Identify funding for relocating the headquarters.”

Section 4091 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided: “The University of the District of Columbia shall have exclusive use of the closed Bertie Backus Middle School building and site located at 5171 South Dakota Avenue, N.E., in Ward 5, to expand upon its collegiate mission.”

Section 422 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 422. The University of the District of Columbia shall have exclusive use of the closed Patricia R. Harris Educational Center School building and site located at 4600 Livingston Road, S.E., in Ward 8, to expand upon its collegiate mission and Workforce Development and Lifelong Learning Program by continuing to provide Vocational Education and Community College of the District of Columbia courses.”

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.